District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.11

Pleadings and accompanying documents.

(a)

In a proceeding under this chapter, a petitioner seeking to establish a support order, to determine parentage, or to register and modify a support order of another state must file a petition. Unless otherwise ordered under § 46-303.12, the petition or accompanying documents must provide, so far as known, the name, residential address, and social security numbers of the obligor and the obligee or the parent and alleged parent, and the name, sex, residential address, social security number, and date of birth of each child for whose benefit support is sought or whose parentage is to be determined. Unless filed at the time of registration, the petition must be accompanied by a copy of any support order known to have been issued by another tribunal. The petition may include any other information that may assist in locating or identifying the respondent.

(b)

The petition must specify the relief sought. The petition and accompanying documents must conform substantially with the requirements imposed by the forms mandated by federal law for use in cases filed by a support enforcement agency.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 310, 42 DCR 6748
redesignated § 311, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(11), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.10.
2001 Ed., § 46-303.10

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, rewrote subsec. (a), which had read as follows: “(a) A petitioner seeking to establish or modify a support order or to determine parentage in a proceeding under this chapter must verify the petition. Unless otherwise ordered under § 46-303.11 (nondisclosure of information in exceptional circumstances), the petition or accompanying documents must provide, so far as known, the name, residential address, and social security numbers of the obligor and the obligee, and the name, sex, residential address, social security number, and date of birth of each child for whom support is sought. The petition must be accompanied by a certified copy of any support order in effect. The petition may include any other information that may assist in locating or identifying the respondent.”

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Former § 46-303.11 has been recodified as § 46-303.12 by D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(12).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 311 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).